zh-TW: 油漆/染料形式: 凝膠; 硬; 液態; 記號筆; 膏劑; 粉末; 噴霧; 其他
ro-RO: Formă vopsea/colorant: Gel; Dur; Lichid; Marker; Pastă; Pudră; Spray; Altele
en: Paint/Dye form: Gel; Hard; Liquid; Marker; Paste; Powder; Spray; Other
nl: Vorm verf: Gel; Hard; Vloeistof; Markeerstift; Pasta; Poeder; Spray; Andere
da: Form for maling/farve: Gel; Hård; Væske; Markør; Puré; Pulver; Spray; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika barve/barvila: Gel; Trda; Tekočina; Flomaster; Pasta; Prašek; Razpršilo; Drugo
hr-HR: Oblik boje/tinte: Gel; Čvrsta; Tekućina; Marker; Pasta; Prah; Sprej; Ostalo
pt-PT: Forma de tinta/tintura: Gel; Duro; Líquido; Marcador; Pasta; Pó; Pulverizador; Outro
ko: 페인트/염료 형태: 젤; 하드; 액상; 마커; 페이스트; 가루; 스프레이; 기타
fr: Forme de peinture/teinture: Gel; Difficile; Liquide; Marqueur; Pâte; Poudré; Vaporisateur; Autre
tr: Boya/Badana formu: Jel; Sert; Sıvı; İşaretçi; Şekillendirici; Pudra; Sprey; Diğer
ru: Форма краски/красителя: Гель; Твердый; Жидкий; Маркер; Паста; Порошок; Спрей; Другое
es: Forma de la pintura/tinte: Gel; Duro; Líquido; Marcador; Pasta; Polvo; Aerosol; Otros
th: รูปแบบการทาสี/ย้อม: เจล; แข็ง; แบบเหลว; ปากกาเคมี; เนื้อครีม; แบบผง; สเปรย์; อื่นๆ
vi: Dạng sơn/nhuộm: Gel; Cứng; Liquid; Đánh dấu; Sáp; Bột; Dạng xịt; Khác
it: Forma di pittura/tintura: Gel; Dura; Liquido; Pennarello; Pasta; Polvere; Spray; Altro
cs: Forma barvy/barviva: Gel; Tvrdá; Kapalina; Popisovač; Pasta; Prášek; Sprej; Jiné
el: Μορφή βαφής/χρωστικής ουσίας: Τζελ; Σκληρή; Υγρό; Μαρκαδόρος; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Σπρέι; Άλλο
fi: Maalin/väriaineen muoto: Geeli; Kova; Nestemäinen; Merkitsin; Tahna; Jauhe; Suihke; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на боя/багрило: Гел; Твърд; Течност; Маркер; Паста; Пудра; Спрей; Други
pt-BR: Forma da tinta/tintura: Gel; Duro; Líquido; Marcador; Creme; Pó; Spray; Outro
zh-CN: 涂料/染料形式: 发胶; 硬; 液体; 马克笔; 发蜡; 粉末; 喷雾; 其他
de: Farb-/Farbform: Gel; Hart; Flüssig; Marker; Paste; Puder; Spray; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Forma farby/farbiva: Gél; Tvrdý; Kvapalina; Fixka; Pasta; Prášok; Sprej; Iné
ja: ペイント/染料フォーム: ゲル; ハード; リキッド; マーカー; ペースト; パウダー; スプレー; その他
pl: Forma farby/barwnika: Żel; Twardy; Płyn; Znacznik; Pasta; Proszek; Natrysk; Inne
lt-LT: Dažų konsistencija: Gelis; Kieti; Skysti; Žymeklis; Pasta; Milteliai; Purškiami; Kita
hu: Festék formája: Gél; Kemény; Folyadék; Jelölő; Paszta; Por; Spray; Egyéb
sv: Färg-/Färgämnesform: Gel; Hård; Vätska; Markeringspenna; Pasta; Pulver; Spray; Övrigt
nb: Malings-/fargeform: Gel; Hard; Væske; Markør; Lim; Pulver; Spray; Annet